.deps/sux.LR.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Sumerian

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective 
# <np>     # Proper name
# <pprs>   # Present participle
# <pp> 	   # Past participle
# <gen>    # Genitive
# <pr> 	   # Preposition
#  <sdef n="obj" 	c="Object"/>
#    <sdef n="subj" 	c="Subject"/>
#    <sdef n="pers" 	c="Personal (pronoun)"/>
#    <sdef n="pres" 	c="Present (tense)"/>
#    <sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/>
#    <sdef n="p1" 	c="First person"/>
#    <sdef n="p2" 	c="Second person"/>
#    <sdef n="p3" 	c="Third person"/>
#    <sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/>
#    <sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/>
#    <sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular / plural"/>
#    <sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/>
#    <sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/>
#    <sdef n="mf" 	c="Masculine / feminine"/>
# n="neg"    c= "negative" (not)
# coh = "cohrotative" (let me/us)
# pre = "precative" (let him/them)



# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>  # Plural
# <sg>  # Singular

# Other symbols
# >      # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################



# 1. NOUN PATTERN
# a. nom is denoting if the noun will be singular or plural based on
#      I. if nothing attached it is singular
#      II. if repeataion of noun or if the last character us repeated with -e-ne or -ene
# b. affix is denoting the prepositions and geneatives
# -> different affixes denotes different prepositions(to,from, etc) which are added in the rules
# c. -e deontes it is a subject for a transitive verb



PATTERNS
#NounRoot :verbal_root? prns? number case?
NounRoot
#NounRoot prns? number? case?
NounRoot [<pl>:-] :NounRoot


#LEXICON prns
# possasive
# singular
#<prn><poss><p1><mf><sg>:-gu10
#<prn><poss><p2><mf><sg>:-zu
#<prn><poss><p3><m><sg>:-ni
#<prn><poss><p3><m><sg><case_by>:-ne
#<prn><poss><p3><m><sg><case_in>:-na
#<prn><poss><p3><nt><sg>:-bi
#<prn><poss><p3><nt><sg><case_by>:-be
#<prn><poss><p3><nt><sg><case_in>:-ba

#plural
#<prn><poss><p1><mf><pl>:-me
#<prn><poss><p1><mf><pl><case_in>:-me-a
#<prn><poss><p2><mf><pl>:-zu-ne-ne
#<prn><poss><p2><mf><pl><case_in>:-zu-ne-ne-a
#<prn><poss><p3><mf><pl>:-ne-ne
#<prn><poss><p3><mf><pl><case_in>:-ne-ne-a


# subjective
# singular
#<prn><subj><p1><mf><sg>:-me-en # I
#<prn><subj><p2><mf><sg>:-me-en # you
#<prn><subj><p3><m><sg>:-am6  # he/she/it is
#<prn><subj><p3><m><sg>:-am3  # he/she/it is
#<prn><subj><p3><m><sg>:-am  # he/she/it is
# plural
#<prn><subj><p1><mf><pl>:-me-en-de-en
#<prn><subj><p2><mf><pl>:-me-en-ze-en
#<prn><subj><p3><mf><pl>:-me-es


# subjective
# singular
#<prn><subj><p1><mf><sg>:-ga-e
#<prn><subj><p1><mf><sg>:-ga2-e
#<prn><subj><p1><mf><sg>:-ge26-e
#<prn><subj><p2><mf><sg>:-za-e
#<prn><subj><p2><mf><sg>:-ze2-e
#<prn><subj><p3><mf><sg>:-e-ne
#<prn><subj><p3><mf><sg>:-a-ne


# plural
#<prn><subj><p3><nt><pl>:-e-ne-ne
#<prn><subj><p3><nt><pl>:-a-ne-ne





#LEXICON number
#<pl>:-{redup}e-ne
#<pl>:-ke-ne
#<pl>:-ene
#<pl>:-ne
#<sg>:



#LEXICON case
#<gen>:-bi   # of ask
#<gen>:-ni   # of ask
#<obj>:
#<subj>:
#<gen>:-{redup}a   # of
#<case_in>:-a
#<case_from>:-ta
#<case_with>:-da
#<case_toward>:-se3
#<case_toward>:-se
#<case_like_as>:-gin7
#<case_for><obj>:-ra 
#<case_by><subj>:-e







#===============================================================================================================#
#### =================================================== VERBAL PATTERNS




# 2. verbal PATTERNS

# a. adjective like verbs and preset participles
#PATTERNS
#verbal_root_adj adj_affixes?
#LEXICON adj_affixes


# b. Verbal phrases
# Q. how to add the condition that if the right side of the lexicon apears than only take the morph of that ??

PATTERNS
verbal_root


#:mod_pref?(1) :conj_pref?(1) :case_elem?(1) :pronom_suf?(1) verbal_root case_ending? mod_pref?(1): conj_pref?(1): case_elem?(1): pronom_suf?(1):
#verbal_root [<pl>:-] :verbal_root

#LEXICON mod_pref
#<neg>:nu-  # negation
#<neg>:la-
#<neg>:li-
#<pre>:he2- # Precative  (May..., Let him)
#<pre>:ha-
#<pre>:hu-
#<coh>:ga- #Cohortative (Let me / I shall, I did indeed)
#<coh>:gu2-
#<coh>:gi4-
#<prh>:na- # Prohibitive (May not!, should not)
#<prh>:na- # Strong Affirmative ( it indeed ... )
#<cat_neg>:ba-ra- #Categorical Negative (certainly will not/ did not)
#<pros>:u- #Prospective ( after that ... )
#<cons>:si- #Contrapunctive , consequence (therefore... )
#<cons>:sa-
#<cons>:su-
#<cons>:se3-
#<fru>:nuš- #Frustrative maybe nu + ši (if only, were it that... )
#<fru>:nu-uš-  


#LEXICON conj_pref
#<ven>:mu-
#<mid>:ba-
#:bi2-
#:i3-
#:ba-


#LEXICON case_elem
#<prn><subj><m><p1><past><sg>:
#<prn><subj><m><p2><past><sg>:e-
#<prn><subj><m><p3><past><sg>:un-
#<prn><subj><m><p3><past><sg>:{redup}n-
#<prn><subj><m><p3><past><sg>:{redup}b-
#<prn><subj><m><p1><pl>:me-
#<prn><subj><m><p2><sg>:ra-
#<prn><subj><m><p3><sg>:na-
#<prn><subj><m><p3><pl>:ne-
#<prn><subj><m><p3><past><sg>:da-
#<prn><subj><m><p3><past><sg>:ta-
#<prn><subj><m><p3><past><sg>:si-
#<prn><subj><m><p3><past><sg>:ni-


#LEXICON pronom_suf
#a-

#LEXICON case_ending
#<prn><subj><p1><m><sg><pres>:-en
#<prn><subj><p2><m><sg><pres>:-en
#<prn><subj><p1><m><sg><pres>:-{redup}e-en
##<prn><subj><p3><m><sg><pres>:
#<prn><subj><p1><m><pl><pres>:-en-de3-en
#<prn><subj><p1><m><pl><past>:-{redup}e-en-de3-en
#<prn><subj><p2><m><pl><pres>:-en-ze2-en
#<prn><subj><p2><m><pl><past>:-{redup}e-en-ze2-en
#<prn><subj><p3><mf><pl><pres>:-ne
#<prn><subj><p3><mf><pl><past>:-es

# adjective case endings 
#<pprs>:-{redup}a
#<pp>:-{redup}a






# =========================================================

# 3. Named Entity PATTERNS

PATTERNS 
Named_Entities






# =========================================================

# 4. Numbers

PATTERNS 
Numbers






# =========================================================

# 5. Coordinative Conjugations

PATTERNS 
Conjugation






###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################









# ===================================================================================================================
# 1. Simple and compund Nouns with basic patterns

LEXICON NounRoot
